Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-904
Record; what constitutes.

The case, the submission and the judgment shall constitute the record.

R.S.1867, Code § 568, p. 494;

R.S.1913, § 7720;

C.S.1922, § 8664;

C.S.1929, § 20-904;

R.S.1943, § 25-904.